Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1582
Judgment other than for the recovery of money or real property; enforcement by attachment or rule of court; notice.

When the judgment is not for the recovery of money or real property, the same may be enforced by attachment by the court rendering the judgment, upon motion made, or by a rule of the court upon the defendant; but in either case, notice of the motion, or service of a copy of the rule, shall be made on the defendant a reasonable time before the order of attachment is made.

R.S.1867, Code § 560, p. 491;

R.S.1913, § 8130;

C.S.1922, § 9066;

C.S.1929, § 20-1584;

R.S.1943, § 25-1582.

Judgment becomes lien on after-acquired property. Jones v. Knosp, 91 Neb. 224, 135 N.W. 1049 (1912).